Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2246
Appraisal without credentials; penalty.

Any person required to be credentialed by the Real Property Appraiser Act who, directly or indirectly for another, offers, attempts, agrees to engage in, or engages in real property appraisal practice or who advertises or holds himself or herself out to the general public as a real property appraiser in this state without obtaining proper credentialing under the act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be ineligible to apply for credentialing under the act for a period of one year from the date of his or her conviction of such offense. The board may, in its discretion, credential such person within such one-year period upon application and after an administrative hearing.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 46;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 50;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 38;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 66;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 66;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 36;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 87.